sv: Bromstyp för racerkart: Bandbroms; Trumma; Hydraulisk skivbroms; Mekanisk skivbroms; Regenerativ (elektrisk); Övrigt
ja: レーシングカートブレーキタイプ: バンドブレーキ; ドラム; 油圧式ディスク; 機械式ディスク; 回生 (電動); その他
th: ประเภทเบรกสำหรับรถโกคาร์ท: แบนด์เบรก; ดรัมเบรก; ดิสก์เบรกไฮดรอลิก; ดิสก์เบรกกลไก; เบรกแบบจ่ายพลังงานคืน (ไฟฟ้า); อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 卡丁车刹车类型: 抱刹; 鼓刹; 液压盘刹; 机械盘刹; 制动能量回收（电动）; 其他
hu: Versenygokart féktípusa: Szalagfék; Dobfék; Hidraulikus tárcsafék; Mechanikus tárcsafék; Regeneratív (elektromos); Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de travão do kart de corrida: Travão de cinta; Tambor; Disco hidráulico; Disco mecânico; Regenerativo (elétrico); Outro
en: Racing kart brake type: Band brake; Drum; Hydraulic disc; Mechanical disc; Regenerative (electric); Other
el: Τύπος φρένων αγωνιστικού καρτ: Φρένο με ιμάντα; Ταμπούρο; Υδραυλικό δισκόφρενο; Μηχανικό δισκόφρενο; Αναγεννητικό (ηλεκτρικό); Άλλο
ko: 레이싱 카트 브레이크 유형: 밴드 브레이크; 드럼; 유압식 디스크; 기계식 디스크; 회생 제동(전기); 기타
cs: Typ brzdy pro závodní motokáry: Pásová brzda; Bubnová; Hydraulická kotoučová; Mechanická kotoučová; Rekuperační (elektrická); Jiné
fr: Type de freinage du kart de course: Frein à sangle; Tambour; Disque hydraulique; Disque mécanique; Régénératif (électrique); Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta zavor dirkalnega gokarta: Tračna zavora; Bobnasta zavora; Hidravlična kolutna zavora; Mehanska kolutna zavora; Regenerativna (električna); Drugo
de: Bremstyp des Rennkarts: Bandbremse; Trommelbremse; Hydraulische Scheibenbremse; Mechanische Scheibenbremse; Regenerativ (elektrisch); Sonstige
ro-RO: Tip de frână pentru kart de curse: Frână cu bandă; Tambur; Disc hidraulic; Disc mecanic; Regenerativă (electrică); Altele
bg-BG: Тип спирачна система на състезателен картинг: Лентова спирачка; Барабанна; Хидравлична дискова; Механична дискова; Регенеративна (електрическа); Друго
fi: Karting-kilpa-auton jarrujen tyyppi: Vannajarru; Rumpu; Hydraulinen levy; Mekaaninen levy; Regeneratiivinen (sähköinen); Muu
pl: Typ hamulca gokarta wyścigowego: Hamulec taśmowy; Bębnowy; Tarczowy hydrauliczny; Tarczowy mechaniczny; Regeneracyjny (elektryczny); Inne
it: Tipo di freno per kart da corsa: Freno a nastro; Tamburo; Disco idraulico; Disco meccanico; Rigenerativo (elettrico); Altro
nb: Bremsetype for racerkart: Båndbrems; Trommel; Hydraulisk skive; Mekanisk skive; Regenerativ (elektrisk); Annet
zh-TW: 賽車卡丁車煞車類型: 帶式煞車; 鼓煞; 液壓碟煞; 機械碟煞; 再生煞車 (電動); 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta kočnice za karting: Trakasta kočnica; Bubanj; Hidraulični disk; Mehanički disk; Regenerativna (električna); Ostalo
nl: Racekart remtype: Bandrem; Trommel; Hydraulische schijfrem; Mechanische schijfrem; Regeneratief (elektrisch); Overig
ru: Тип тормозной системы гоночного карта: Ленточный тормоз; Барабанный; Гидравлический дисковый; Механический дисковый; Рекуперативный (электрический); Другое
lt-LT: Lenktyninio kartingo stabdžių tipas: Juostinis stabdys; Būgninis; Hidraulinis diskinis; Mechaninis diskinis; Regeneracinis (elektrinis); Kita
vi: Loại phanh xe đua kart: Phanh đai; Phanh tang trống; Đĩa thủy lực; Đĩa cơ; Phanh tái sinh (điện); Khác
sk-SK: Typ brzdy pretekárskej motokáry: Pásová brzda; Bubnová; Hydraulická kotúčová; Mechanická kotúčová; Regeneračná (elektrická); Iné
pt-BR: Kart de corrida tipo de freio: Freio de cinta; Tambor; Disco hidráulico; Disco mecânico; Regenerativo (elétrico); Outro
da: Bremsetype til racerkart: Båndbremse; Tromlebremse; Hydraulisk skivebremse; Mekanisk skivebremse; Regenerativ (elektrisk); Andet
es: Tipo de freno de kart de carreras: Freno de banda; Tambor; Disco hidráulico; Disco mecánico; Regenerativo (eléctrico); Otro
tr: Yarış kartı fren tipi: Bantlı fren; Kampana; Hidrolik disk; Mekanik disk; Rejeneratif (elektrikli); Diğer